Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 8 District Court
8-8-16.2.
District court clerk/magistrate.

Any person who is a member of the bar of Rhode Island may be appointed district court clerk/magistrate by the chief judge in his or her capacity as administrative head of the court, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The district court clerk/magistrate shall hold that office for a term of ten (10) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the assignment of the district court clerk/magistrate to more than one such term, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The district court clerk/magistrate shall have the power to hear and determine any matters that may be assigned to the district court clerk/magistrate by the chief judge all to the same effect as if done by a judge of the district court, including, but not limited to, matters relating to the determination of, monitoring, collection, and payment of restitution and court-ordered fines, fees, and costs or the ordering of community service in lieu of or in addition to the payment of restitution, fines, fees, and costs, consistent with other provisions of the general laws.

The clerk/magistrate may be authorized:

To regulate all proceedings before him or her;

To do all acts necessary or proper for the efficient performance of his or her duties;

To require the production before him or her of books, papers, vouchers, documents and writings;

To rule upon the admissibility of evidence;

To issue subpoenas for the appearance of witnesses, to put witnesses on oath, to examine them and to call parties to the proceeding and examine them upon oath;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her fined or to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, for failure to appear in response to a summons or for refusal to answer questions or produce evidence or for behavior disrupting a proceeding or other contempt of his or her authority; provided; however, that no such imprisonment shall occur prior to review by a judge of the court;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her fined or to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, for failure to comply with a pending order to provide payment or to perform any other act; provided, however, that no such imprisonment shall occur prior to review by a judge of the court;

To issue a capias and/or body attachment for the failure of a party or witness to appear after having been properly served or given notice by the court and, should the court not be in session, the person apprehended may be detained at the adult correctional institutions, if an adult, or at the Rhode Island training school for youth, if a child, until the next session of the court;

To issue writs of habeas corpus to bring before him or her or a judge of the court any person in jail or in prison to be examined as a witness in a suit or proceeding, civil or criminal, pending before the court, or whose presence is necessary as a party or otherwise necessary so that the ends of justice may be attained, and for no other purpose; and

To issue warrants of arrest and search warrants to the same extent as an associate judge of the court.

Except as otherwise indicated, a party aggrieved by an order entered by the district court clerk/magistrate shall be entitled to a review of the order, whether by appeal or otherwise, by a judge of the court. The court shall, by rules of procedure, establish procedures for review of contempt and adjudications of the clerk/magistrate.

The district court clerk/magistrate shall:

Be governed by the commission on judicial tenure and discipline, pursuant to chapter 16 of this title, in the same manner as justices and judges;

Be subject to all provisions of the canons of judicial ethics;

Be subject to all criminal laws relative to judges by virtue of §§

11-7-1

and

11-7-2

.

Receive any salary that may be established by the state court administrator pursuant to §

8-15-4

. The provisions of this section shall be afforded liberal construction.

Any district court clerk/magistrate who has been engaged for a period of twenty (20) years and has reached the age of sixty (60) years, may upon retirement, at his or her own request and at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as a magistrate of the district court as the chief judge of the district court shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such service, the district court clerk/magistrate shall have all the powers and authority of a magistrate of the district court but otherwise shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties. Such a retired district court clerk/magistrate shall not be counted in the number of magistrates provided by law for the district court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 5; P.L. 2002, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 7; P.L. 2022, ch. 433, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 434, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

8-8-17.
Duties of division clerks.

The clerk of each division of the district court shall:

Keep a docket, and an alphabetical index thereof, either in writing or by means of an electronic information storage system or other data compilation system, of all actions, complaints, or proceedings, either of a civil or criminal nature, that may be entered or had in the division, and shall note in the docket against each case the decision or determination thereof, all subsequent proceedings, and the judgment therein, and, in all criminal cases, the fines or imprisonment to which the defendant may be sentenced.

Record the decisions, judgments, and proceedings of the division in a book to be kept for that purpose or in an electronic information storage system or any other data compilation system.

Tax costs, including officer’s fees, in all cases, civil or criminal, that may be entered, commenced, or pending in the division; all taxation by the clerk shall be subject to revision by any district judge sitting in the division.

Receive all fines and costs in criminal cases and all court fees in civil cases and account therefor as by law required.

Have custody of the seal of the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 202, § 2.

8-8-18.
Failure of clerk to account for fines and costs.

For any willful neglect or refusal of the clerk of the district court to account or for any willful neglect or refusal of any clerk of the district court to pay over all fines and costs received by him or her, he or she shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense and also double the amount of fines and costs received by him or her and so detained.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-19.
Duties of chief clerk.

The chief clerk shall have general supervisory power over the clerks of the court and shall be responsible to the chief judge for the proper and efficient operation of their offices. To that end he or she shall:

Temporarily transfer clerks to other divisions outside of their own when he or she deems it necessary. Such transfers shall be subject to the approval of the chief judge.

Procure all necessary papers, books, and other documents as the state controller or as the chief judge may direct, upon which the clerks shall keep their records and make their reports and returns.

Systematize record keeping throughout the divisions.

Gather such statistics as the chief judge shall direct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-20.
Sale of blank writs prohibited.

No judge or clerk of the district court shall sell any blank writ officially signed by him or her to any person except an attorney at law or deliver to any person other than an attorney at law any such writ with permission, in the absence of the judge or clerk to fill or cause the writ to be filled, under a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for each offense and ineligibility to serve as a judge or clerk of the district court after conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-21.
District court conference.

There shall be a district court conference held annually, or more often, at such time and place as shall be designated by the chief judge. This conference shall consist of all the judges of the district court. The chief judge shall preside and the chief clerk shall act as secretary of the conference. The attorney general, or one of his or her assistants, shall attend to aid and advise the conference. The conference shall, with the concurrence of the chief judge, have power to direct in what manner and to what extent entries shall be made of the decisions, judgments, and proceedings of the district court. To the end that the work of the district court shall be efficiently and expeditiously transacted it shall give attention to all matters believed helpful to that end and shall make recommendations regarding procedure and other matters pertaining to the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-22.
Statutory references to earlier courts.

Whenever in any statute reference is made to justice courts, trial justices or clerks of the justice courts of the different cities and towns, district courts, justices of district courts, and clerks of district courts, that statute shall be taken and construed to refer to the district court created by this chapter and its judges and clerks. Whenever in any statute reference is made to a particular predecessor court, that statute shall be taken and construed to refer to the division of the district court which embraces the territory of the predecessor court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-23.
Savings clause.

The divisions of the district court established in §

8-8-2

shall have custody of all records, books, and papers of the district court of the several judicial districts heretofore existing within their respective geographical limits. All civil actions and criminal proceedings and processes pending in the district courts of the several judicial districts heretofore existing and all writs issued out of and returnable to those courts shall continue with the same force and effect in the district court established by this chapter, within its respective divisions; and all rights and liabilities of the parties to such civil actions and criminal proceedings and processes commenced prior to September 15, 1969, including costs of appeal, shall continue in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 4.

8-8-24.
Tax proceedings to be without jury and de novo — Precedence on calendar.

Each appeal of a final decision of the tax administrator concerning an assessment, deficiency, or otherwise shall be an original, independent proceeding in the nature of a suit in equity to set aside the final decision and shall be tried de novo and without a jury. Every such matter shall have precedence over all other civil cases on the calendar on the date to which it is assigned for trial and shall continue to have precedence on the calendar on a day-to-day basis until it is heard.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-25.
Time for commencement of proceeding against the division of taxation.

Any taxpayer aggrieved by a final decision of the tax administrator concerning an assessment, deficiency, or otherwise may file a complaint for redetermination of the assessment, deficiency, or otherwise in the court as provided by statute under title 44.

The complaint shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the mailing of notice of the final decision and shall set forth the reasons why the final decision is alleged to be erroneous and praying relief therefrom. The clerk of the court shall thereupon summon the division of taxation to answer the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-26.
Prepayment as condition precedent to review of tax case.

A taxpayer’s right to file a complaint pursuant to §

8-8-25

for review of a final decision of the tax administrator ordering an assessment, deficiency, or otherwise shall be conditional upon prepayment of all taxes, interest, and penalties set forth in the assessment, deficiency, or otherwise; provided, however, that in lieu of the prepayment, the taxpayer may file together with his or her complaint a motion for an exemption from the prepayment requirement. The taxpayer shall set the motion down for hearing within twenty (20) days after the answer to the complaint is filed; otherwise, the motion shall be deemed to be denied. The court shall grant the motion if it determines both: (1) that the taxpayer has a reasonable probability of success on the merits; and (2) that the taxpayer is unable to prepay all taxes, interest, and penalties set forth in the assessment, deficiency, or otherwise. In making its determination on the issue of ability to prepay, the court shall consider not only the taxpayer’s own financial resources but also the ability of the taxpayer to borrow the required funds. If the motion is denied, the taxpayer shall make prepayment within thirty (30) days of the entry of the court’s order denying the motion; otherwise, the complaint shall be dismissed upon motion of the tax administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-27.
Refund suits.

Any taxpayer may bring an action for a refund of taxes previously overpaid. The suit for refund may not be brought prior to the date of a final determination by the tax administrator denying the claim for refund. No action for a refund of tax shall be brought after the expiration of thirty (30) days from a notice of final determination of the tax administrator denying the claimed refund.

As used in this section and §

8-8-28

, “tax” includes any surcharge imposed under §

1-6-2

, and “taxpayer” includes an operator as defined in §

1-6-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 424, § 3.

8-8-28.
Burden of proof in tax cases.

In all tax cases before the court, and upon appeal therefrom, a preponderance of the evidence shall suffice to sustain the burden of proof. The burden of proof shall fall upon the party seeking affirmative relief and the burden of going forward with the evidence shall shift as in other civil litigation. In any proceedings in which the division of taxation alleges fraud or an exception to the normal statute of limitations on assessment, the burden of proof in respect of that issue shall be upon the division of taxation. To be sustained on the issue of fraud, the division of taxation must sustain a burden of clear and convincing proof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

Form of Writ.

There was no presumption that writ was illegally issued merely because the name of an attorney did not appear thereon, but there was a presumption that it was lawfully obtained and issued. Remington v. Benoit,

19 R.I. 698

, 36 A. 718,

1897 R.I. LEXIS 8

(1897).

8-8-29.
Court stenographer in tax cases.

Any party may obtain the services of a court stenographer in the district court in a tax case, and that party shall pay all costs of the court stenographer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-30.
Decision of the court — Form and contents.

The court shall render its decision in writing, including therein a concise statement of the facts found by the court and the conclusions of law reached by the court. The court may affirm, reverse, modify, or remand any determination or shall grant such relief, invoke such other remedies, and issue such orders in accordance with its decision as shall be appropriate in a court of general jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-31.
Frivolous appeals.

Whenever it appears to the court that proceedings before it have been instituted by the taxpayer solely for delay and that the taxpayer’s complaint is frivolous and groundless, damages in an amount not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus costs may be assessed against the taxpayer by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-32.
Review by supreme court.

Any party in interest, if aggrieved by a final judgment rendered in proceedings brought under this chapter, may within twenty (20) days from the date of entry of the judgment petition the supreme court of the state of Rhode Island for a writ of certiorari to review any questions of law involved. The petition for writ of certiorari shall set forth the errors claimed. Upon the filing of such a petition with the clerk of the supreme court, the supreme court may, if it sees fit, issue its writ of certiorari to the district court to certify to the supreme court the record of the proceeding under review.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 183, § 1.

8-8-33.
Severability.

The holding of any section or sections or parts of this chapter to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part hereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 17; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 17.